Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3508
Criminal history record information system or system, defined.

Criminal history record information system or system shall mean a system including the equipment, facilities, procedures, agreements, and organizations thereof, for the collection, processing, preservation, or dissemination of criminal history record information.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 8.